ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/sk_SK/hyph_sk_SK.dic
n2s3p
n2s3f
2n1n
2n1c
1nú
2nú1b
nú1r
nú1ka
nú1č
2nt
n1ta
n1tá
n2tán
n1tr
n1tu
n1tú1
n1ty
n1tó
n1j
2n1k
n2kt
1ní
2nív
1né1
1ny
1ný
n1f
n1g
1nó
n1ž
n1z
2nč
n1ča
n1či
n1če
2c.
1ca
ca1p
1ci
ci1le
ci1lu
3cin
1ce
ce1le
ce1ut
c1la
1clo
2c2h.
1cha
1chá
2ch1š
1che
ch1lo
ch1ly
ch1ri
1chu
2chn
1chcem
ch2c
ch1ce
1chcú
1chú
1chí
1chy
2chy1ň
c1m
1co
1cv
1cu
cu1ko
c1n
c1t
1c2tí
c1k
1cí
2cé1
1cy
cy2n
cyk3
c2ť
ú1b
ú3dz
ú1ši
ú1še
úš3t
úš1ť
ú1la
ú1ri
ú1re
ú1ru
ú1h
ú2mr
ú1o
ú1se1
ús1kov
úsk2
ú2ni
ú1cho
ú2chu
ú1ta
út1r
ú1ty
úk3l
úk1r
ú1ko
ú1ku
ú1ky
ú1pi
ú1pe
ú2pr
ú1po
ú1pu
ú1py
ú1f
ú1zi
úz1l
ú1zo
2t.
3t2a.
ta1d1lo
ta1ré1
ta1s2c
ta1na
1ta1ný
tat1r
3tatočná
ta1t2o
tatoč1n
3tatočnom
tatoč1no
3tatočný2m.
tatoč1ný
1ta1jú
ta1ka
ta1ke
ta1ké1
ta1ký
taz3
t1b
1ti
3ti2a.
ti1lu
ti1r
2tih
ti1sl
tis2ku
tis1k2
ti1kl
1tá2r.
1tám
1tác
1tá1p
tá1zi
t1š
1te
te1l
teh3l
tes1t
2te2n1n
2te2n1k
3tej
te1ko
t1lan
t1le
t1lo
t1lu
t1lí
t1lý
trid2
2trih
t1riť
3trebu1j
tre1bu
t1re1bú
3tredia
tre1di
3trediu
3trední1ko
tre2d1n
tred1ní
t1rok
1tr1v
1t2ma
t2mu
1t2o
to1š
to1ly
to1vl
to1ut
2toj
to1ja
to1ka
to1kr
to1p
to1g
to1x
to1či
t2v
2t3váram
tvá1ra
t3ví
tvy2
3tu.
tu1b
tu1i
tu1lo
tu1ro
tu1ho
1tus
1tu1j
tu1po
2t1s
t1su1
2t1n
t3ne
t1c
tú1ra
tú1ro
tú1ry
tú1pa
t1t
t1k2
t2kl
1tí
2tíž
t1p
1té1
1tý
1t1f
t1g
1tór
1tón
t1ľ
t1č
t1ň
2j.
jad1
1jal
ja2s
jas1t
1jan
1jac
1jat
3ja1te
ja1ka
ja1ke
ja1ké1
ja1ký
1jakým
ja1p
jaz3v2
1jať
j1b2
2j1d
1ji
jih1
j1im
1já
j1š
jš1ka
1je
je1le
j1e1f
j1l
j1r
j1h
2j1m
1jo
2j1o1b
j1o1s
j1v
j1uš
ju1r
ju1h
ju2n
1ju1j
2j1s2
j2sť
j1n
j1c
1jú
j1ú1r
j1ús
3jú2c.
3jú1ce
j1ú1č
2j1t
j1j
j1k
1jí
j1p
j1f
j1ž
j1z
j1č
j1ň
j1ť
2k.
1kav
1kaj
1ka1í
kap1lá
1kať
1kd
1kia
1kio
1kiu
kis3
1káš
1káv
1ket
1keť
1kla1dy
k2li
1klí
k2lé1
k1ly
1kre1a
1kre1á
k1ret2
1kr1m
kr1vá
k2r2s
kr2s1ty
krs1ku
kr1sk2
krs1ky
krí2kl
k2ry
k1rý.
1kr1č
1kh
2km
ko1b
ko1š
ko1ly
1koh2
ko1my
1ko1va
1kovs2
ko1ut
ko1s2l
ko1so
ko1str
1koj
ko1ja
ko1ju
ko1ka
ko1kr
1kop
ko1pa
ko1pi
ko1pá
ko1pe
ko1po
ko1g
1koľ
ko1zr
ko1č
k2v
1kvit
k3vu
ku1i
ku1lo
ku1rá
kum2
ku1me
ku2mom
ku1mo
ku1pe
ku1po
k1s
2kn
k1na
k1ná
2k1c
kú1p
k1ta
k1tá
k1tr
k2t2o.
k1t2o
k1tu1
k1tú1
k1ty
k1tó
kí1
k1p
1ké2t
ké1
1ky1n
kyt1l
1ky1ň
1ký1t
2k1f
1kľ
1k1ž
1kz
2kč
k1či
2kň
kĺ1
1kŕ
í1b
íd1la
í1ši
í1še
í2šo
í2šu
íš3t
íš1k
í1l
í1ra
í1ri
í1re
í1ro
í1ru
í1ry
í1ha
íh1l
í1ho
í1me
í1my
í1vi
í1ve
í1vr
í1vo
í1vu
ív3t2
ís1l
ís3m
í1so
í2sn
ís2t
ís1k2
í1sp
í2sľ
í3sľu3by
í2sť
í1na
íc1r
í1cho
í1t
í2t1k2
í1j
í1ka
í1ke
í1kl
ík1l2a.
í1kr
í1ko
í1ku
í1ky
í1pa
í1pe
í1pr
í1po
í1pu
í1py
í1ľa
í1ža
í1za
í1zi
í1ze
í1zo
í1z2v2
í1zu
íz3ne
íz2n
í1či
í1če
í1ň
í1ť
2p.
1p2a.
pa2h
pat1ri
1paj
pap1r
1pil
pi1r
1piť
1pár
1páv
p1š
1pe.
pe1le
pe1ut
pes1t
1pen
pek1l
pe1kla
pez1
1peň
p1l2a.
p2li
p1l2á.
plo1c
pri1st
pre1b
pre1h
pre1st
pr2ve
2pru
prs2tom
p2rs
prs1t2o
pr2c
p1m
1p2o.
1po1b
po2du
po2dz
po1hl
poh2
po2h3li.
poh1li
po1hra
po1hro
po1h1nu
po1hľ
pom2n
po1my
po1vš
po1s
po4sla
pos2l
pos3la1né1
po1ch
po1tl
po1tr
po1t2v
po1ja
po1ka
po1kr
po1p
po1z2
po1ča
po1či
1poň
1pu.
pub1
pu1lo
pu1ko
p1sk2
2p1n
p1c
p2ch
pú1c
p1ta
p1tá
p1tu
2p1k2
p3kn
1pír
1pé1
pó1
2pľ
p1če
p1ň
p1ť
é1
é2d1r
é2re
é2ry
é2mn
é2v
é2c
é2t
é3ta
é3t2o
é3tu
é2f
é3fo
é2z3n
é2č
y1ba
y1bi
y1be
yb1ri
y1bo
y1bu
y1by
y1d
y2dl
yš3l
y1lo
y1lu
y1ly
y1r
y2r1m
y1h2
y3mi
y1vo
y1vu
y1vy1
y1u1
ys3li
ys1le
ys1lu
y2s1lí
ys1ly
y1so
y1n
y1cho
y1ú
y1ta
y1tá
yt3va
yt2v
y1tu
y1ty
y1ja
y1ka
y1ká
yk1e
y2kl
y1ko
ykona3j
yko1na
y1ku
y1ky
y1pa
y1pi
yp2l
y1po
y1py
y1ľ
y1ž
y1z2
y1č
y1ň
ý1b
ý1d
ý1ši
ý1še
ýš1k
ýš1ľ
ý1l
ý1r
ý1h
ý1me
ý1my
ý1v
ývad1
ý1va
ý1u
ý1s2
ý1na
ýna3j
ých1l
ý1cho
ý1t
ý1j
ý1k
ý1p
ý1f
ý1za
ý1zb2
ý1z2d
ý1zi
ý1ze
ý1zo
ý1z2v2
ý1zu
ýz3na2m.
ýz2n
ýz3na1me
ýz3na1mo
ýz3na1mu
ýz3na1my
ý1či
ý1ť
2f.
fa1na
1fi
fiš1
1fá
1f2l
1frá
fo2n3t
1fu
3fu1j
fu1je2
f1s
fú1
f1t2v
f1k
1fí
1fy
f1g
1fó
2g.
1ga
gaš3
g1d
1gi
gi1on
gis1
1gá
1ge
ge2or
ge1o
ges3
g2l
2gle
2glo
g3lov
2glu
g1ran
g1m
1go
1gu
gu1l
gu1rá
gu1m
gu1v
g1n
g2ni
1gú1
g2t
1gé1
ó1be
ób1ro
ó1bu
ó1d
ó1l
ó1ra
ó1ri
ó1re
ó1ro
ó1ru
ó1ry
ó1my
ó1na
ó1c
ó1pa
ó1pi
ó1pe
ó1po
ó1pu
ó1py
ó1gy
ó1za
ó1zi
ó1ze
ó1zu
óz3n
2ľ.
ľa1v
ľak1l
ľ1b
ľ1m
1ľo
ľ1v
ľ1s2
ľ1n
ľ1c
ľú1če
ľ1t
ľ1k
ľko1s
ľ1č
ľ1ň
2ž.
2žb
ž1bo
ž1d
1ži
ž1š
1že
že3ne
2žl
1žr
ž2mu
1žo
žob1r
1žu
žu1l
žu1p
2ž1s2
ž3sk2
2ž1n
ž1c
žú1ra
žú1ry
2ž1t
ž1k
1ží
1žé1
ž1ň
ž1ď
2z.
za1b2
za1dr
zad2ná
za2d1n
zad2ne
zad2nú
zaš2
za1šk
za1šp
zar2
za1r1m
za1h
za1m1k2
za1vl
za1u
za1s2
za1na
za1c
za1t
za1k
za1p
za1ž
za1z
1zač
zb2
zbu1
z2bú
z2bí
z2d
zdis3
z1di
zdu3c
z1du
zd2c
z3dú
2ziš
zá3b
zá1s2
zá1ch
zák1l
zá1k
z1š
ze1l
z2li.
z1li
z2lá
1zle
zlu1
z1lí
zh2
z1hn
zm2
z2mit
z1mi
z1me.
z1mn
zo1b
zo1r2v
zo1hr
zoh2
zo1vr
zo1s
zo1t
zo2tri
zo1pa
zo1z
zo4z3na3j
zoz2n
z2v2
z4vie
z4ván
z3výz3
z1vý
zu1i
zu1me
zu1c
2z1s2
z2n
4zna2j
z4nie
z1ni
z4nič
z4nel
z1ne
z3nu
z3nú
z3né1
z3ny
z3ný
z1c
zú1
z1ú1h
z1t
z2j
z3jí
z1k
z3ka
1zí
z1p2
zpre1
1zé1
1zy
1zý
z1g
1zó
z1ž
z1č
z1ň
1xan
1xib
xi1l
1xom
1xu
x1n
x1t
x1k
x1p2
x1f
1č2a.
1čal
1čav
čas2tý.
čas1tý
1čan
ča1na
ča1k
č1b
1čia
či1le
čis3
č1š
č2šm
1če.
češ3
čes1k2
če1c
1čl
1čr
2č1m
1čo
1ču
č1s
č1n
č3nie
č1ni
č2nem2
č1ne
1čú
2č1t
2č1k
1čí
čís3l
čí1c
č1ň
2ň.
1ň1h
ň1m
1ňu
2ň1t
ä1so
ä1c
ä1ta
ä1tá
ä1tú
ä1ty
ä1ku
äz1b2
ä1ze
ä1zo
ä1zu
äz3n
2ť.
1ť2a.
1ťam
1ťan
ť1d
ť1r
ť1m
1ťo
1ťu1
2ťuč
ť1s2
ť1n
ť1t
ť1k
ť1p
ť1f
ô1be
ô2d
ô3dza
ô1dz
ô1v
ô1s
ô2st
ôs3t2o
ô2j
ô1k
ô1ľ
ôz3n
2ď.
ďa1k
ď1m
1ďo
1ďu
1ďs
1ď1ž
ĺ1ba
ĺ1bi
ĺ1h
ĺ1po
ĺ1z
ĺ1ň
ŕ1m
ŕt1
ŕt3v
ŕ1ž
ŕ1ň
we1
